Utah statutes.
53A-1a-105.5.   Parental permission required for specified in-home programs -- Exceptions.

(1)  The State Board of Education, local school boards, school districts, and public schools are prohibited from requiring infant or preschool in-home literacy or other educational or parenting programs without obtaining parental permission in each individual case.

(2)  This section does not prohibit the Division of Child and Family Services, within the Department of Human Services, from providing or arranging for family preservation or other statutorily provided services in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 4a, or any other in-home services that have been court ordered, pursuant to Title 62A, Chapter 4a, or Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile court Act of 1996.

